Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1354
Construction contracts; plans; reproduction; how obtained.

The department, in its discretion, may provide paper or electronic reproductions of the plans prepared by the department for any contract to be let for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances, to any person desiring such paper or electronic reproductions. Such person shall pay to the department a reasonable sum, to be fixed by the department in an amount estimated to cover the actual cost of preparing such paper or electronic reproductions.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 54, p. 441;

Laws 2019, LB117, § 4.